Maryland, session 2026, HB0061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
10–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) (1) “Institution of postsecondary education” means a school or other
institution that offers an educational program in the State for individuals who are at least
16 years old and who have graduated from or left elementary or secondary school.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0061*

HOUSE BILL 61
(2) “Institution of postsecondary education” does not include:
(i) Any adult education, evening high school, or high school
equivalence program conducted by a public school system of the State; or
(ii) Any apprenticeship or on–the–job training program subject to
approval by the Apprenticeship and Training Council.
Article – Financial Institutions
12–1101.
(a) In this subtitle the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Institution of postsecondary education” has the meaning stated in §
10–101 of the Education Article.
(2) “Institution of postsecondary education” includes an institution that:
(i) 1. Is not accredited by an accredited body recognized and
approved by the U.S. Department of Education; or
2. Is not authorized to operate in the State; and
(ii) Conducts education by correspondence, online, or in person.
(c) (1) “Student financing” means an extension of credit to a consumer,
contractual or otherwise, contingent or absolute, that is:
(i) Not made, insured, or guaranteed under Title IV of the federal
Higher Education Act of 1965;
(ii) Extended to a consumer expressly, in whole or in part, for
postsecondary educational expenses, regardless of whether the extension of credit is
provided by the institution of postsecondary education that the consumer attends; and
(iii) Not a loan secured by real property or a dwelling.
(2) “Student financing” includes:
(i) An extension of credit used to refinance or repay existing student
financing or federal student loan debt; and
(ii) Financial obligations in which the repayment amount is equal to
a predetermined percentage of a consumer’s future income.

HOUSE BILL 61 3
(d) (1) “Student financing company” means an entity engaged in the business
of securing, making, or extending student financing products, or any purchaser, assignee,
or holder of student financing products.
(2) “Student financing company” does not include, to the extent that State
regulation is preempted by federal law:
(i) A bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit
union;
(ii) A wholly owned subsidiary of a bank or credit union; [or]
(iii) An operating subsidiary where each owner is wholly owned by
the same bank or credit union; OR
(IV) AN INSTITUTION OF POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.